Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.060

Courses exclusive to University of Washington.

Except as provided in RCW 28B.30.058, the courses of instruction of the University of Washington shall embrace as exclusive major lines, law, medicine, forest products, logging engineering, library sciences, and fisheries.

[ 2015 c 6 s 3; 2009 c 207 s 2; 1985 c 218 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.060. Prior: 1963 c 23 s 1; 1961 c 71 s 1; prior: (i) 1917 c 10 s 2; RRS s 4533. (ii) 1917 c 10 s 5; RRS s 4536. Formerly RCW 28.77.025; 28.76.060.]